Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 17 Control of Sexually Transmitted Disease

Administrative rules and regulations.

Reporting of venereal diseases, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Disease Surveillance and Control, Subject 511-2-4.

Serologic test for syphilis for pregnant women, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-4.

Law reviews.

For note, “ ‘Rabbit’ Hunting in the Supreme Court:
The Constitutionality of State Prohibitions of Sex Toy Sales Following Lawrence v. Texas,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 245 (2009).

For comment, “The Pursuit of Happiness (and Sexual Freedom): Lawrence v. Texas, Morality Legislation & the Sandy Springs Obscenity Statute,” see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1087 (2015).

31-17-1.
Enumeration of diseases deemed dangerous to public health.

Syphilis, gonorrhea, and chancroid, hereinafter referred to as sexually transmitted diseases, are declared to be contagious, infectious, communicable, and dangerous to the public health.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 275, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-501; Code 1933, § 88-1601, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” in the middle of this Code section.

31-17-2.
Report of diagnosis or treatment to health authorities.

Any physician or other person who makes a diagnosis of or treats a case of sexually transmitted disease and any superintendent or manager of a hospital, dispensary, or charitable or penal institution in which there is discovered a case of sexually transmitted disease shall make report of such case to the health authorities in such form and manner as the Department of Public Health shall direct.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 275, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-502; Code 1933, § 88-1602, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” twice.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-17-3.
Examination and treatment by health authorities.

The authorized agent or agents of the Department of Public Health and county boards of health are directed and empowered, when in their judgment it is necessary to protect the public health, to make examination of persons infected or suspected of being infected with a sexually transmitted disease; to require persons infected with a sexually transmitted disease to report for treatment to a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43 and to continue treatment until cured, or to submit to treatment provided at public expense; and to isolate persons infected or reasonably suspected of being infected with a sexually transmitted disease. Law enforcement authorities of the jurisdiction wherein any such person so infected or suspected of being infected is located shall offer such assistance, including restraint and arrest, as shall be necessary to assure examination and treatment in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 275, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-503; Code 1933, § 88-1604, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 31/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” three times in the first sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “with a sexually transmitted disease” for “with sexually transmitted disease” throughout this Code section.

Cross references.

Blood test recommendation for persons applying for marriage license, §

19-3-40

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-17-4.
Serologic tests of pregnant women.

The department may require every pregnant woman to submit to a standard serologic test, as defined by the department, and may require any person attending or giving prenatal care to such woman to take or cause to be taken a blood specimen for use in such test. Such specimens shall be submitted for laboratory testing in the manner prescribed by the department; and all laboratories conducting such tests shall comply with the rules, regulations, and reporting requirements prescribed therefor by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 599, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 88-1606, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Serologic test for syphilis for pregnant women, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-4.

31-17-4.1.
Chlamydia screening test.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Chlamydia screening test” means any laboratory test of the urogenital tract which specifically detects for infection by one or more agents of chlamydia trachomatis and which test is approved for such purposes by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

“Policy” means any benefit plan, contract, or policy except a disability income policy, specified disease policy, or hospital indemnity policy.

Every insurer authorized to issue an individual or group accident and sickness insurance policy in this state which includes coverage for any female shall include as part of or as a required endorsement to each such policy which is issued, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after July 1, 1998, coverage for one annual chlamydia screening test for those covered females who are not more than 29 years old.

The coverage required under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be subject to such exclusions, reductions, or other limitations as to coverages, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions as may be approved by the Commissioner of Insurance.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the issuance of accident and sickness insurance policies which provide benefits greater than or more favorable to the insured than those required by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to accident and sickness insurance policies issued by a fraternal benefit society, a health care plan, a health maintenance organization, or any similar entity.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be deemed to prohibit the payment of different levels of benefits or having differences in coinsurance percentages applicable to benefit levels for services provided by preferred and nonpreferred providers as otherwise authorized under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 30 of Title 33, relating to preferred provider arrangements.

A contract executed or renewed on or after July 1, 1998, which provides for financing and delivery of health care services through a managed care plan, other than a dental plan, shall provide coverage for one annual chlamydia screening test for each female who is covered under such contract and who is not more than 29 years of age. Such coverage may be subject to such exclusions, reductions, or other limitations as to coverages, deductibles, or copayment provisions as may be approved by the Commissioner of Insurance.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit any managed care plan contract from providing benefits greater than or more favorable to the covered females than those required by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Code Section 31-17-8 shall not apply to this Code section.

This Code section shall be subject to rules and regulations which shall be promulgated by the Commissioner of Insurance regarding notice and enforcement.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 867, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 164, § 56/HB 127.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in paragraph (b)(4), substituted “this subsection” for “subsection (b) of this Code section” near the beginning and deleted “a nonprofit hospital service corporation, a nonprofit medical service corporation,” preceding “a health care” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 867, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The General Assembly finds that chlamydia is a sexually transmitted disease which may cause serious complications in persons infected with it, including pelvic inflammatory disease, infertility, and ectopic pregnancy.
Pregnant women infected with chlamydia may suffer from symptoms such as stillbirths, low birth weight babies, and other serious physical and mental complications for their infants.
Chlamydia is often asymptomatic in women and cannot be detected except with special, though inexpensive, screening tests.
Cure of chlamydia is usually both easy and inexpensive.
The General Assembly further finds that requiring health care insurance and managed care plan coverage of annual chlamydia screening tests for females in the age group most likely to be infected with chlamydia will encourage the testing and treatment needed to detect and cure this destructive disease and result in a marked improvement in the general health of the citizens of this state and the savings of both public and private moneys being spent to deal with the serious consequences of this disease.”

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to health, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 130 (1998).

31-17-4.2.
HIV and Syphilis Pregnancy Screening.

This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia HIV/Syphilis Pregnancy Screening Act of 2015.”

Every physician and health care provider who assumes responsibility for the prenatal care of a pregnant woman during gestation and at delivery shall be required to test such pregnant woman for HIV and syphilis except in cases where the woman refuses the testing. Additionally, every physician and health care provider who provides prenatal care of a pregnant woman during the third trimester of gestation shall offer to test such pregnant woman for HIV and syphilis at the time of first examination during that trimester or as soon as possible thereafter, regardless of whether such testing was performed during the first two trimesters of her pregnancy.

If at the time of delivery there is no written evidence that an HIV test or a syphilis test has been performed, the physician or other health care provider in attendance at the delivery shall order that a test for HIV, syphilis, or both be administered at the time of the delivery except in cases where the woman refuses the testing; provided, however, that if available documentation indicates that a test for HIV and syphilis was already performed during the third trimester of her pregnancy in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section, and the woman does not disclose when questioned any activities posing a risk for infection with HIV or syphilis occurring more recently than would have been detected by such test, the physician or health care provider in attendance at the delivery is not required to order such additional test.

The woman shall be notified of the test to be conducted and shall have the opportunity to refuse the test. A pregnant woman shall submit to an HIV test and a syphilis test pursuant to this Code section unless she specifically refuses. If the woman tests positive for HIV or syphilis, counseling services provided by the Department of Public Health shall be made available to her and she shall be referred to appropriate medical care providers for herself and her child.

If for any reason the pregnant woman is not tested for HIV and syphilis, that fact shall be recorded in the patient’s records, which, if based upon the refusal of the patient, shall relieve the physician or other health care provider of any other responsibility under this Code section.

The Department of Public Health shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of administering the requirements under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17-4.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 173, § 1/HB 429; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1346, § 1/HB 436; Ga. L. 2016, p. 752, § 1/HB 1058.

Cross references.

Control of HIV, T. 31, C. 17A.

HIV tests, generally, §

31-22-9.2

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-17-5.
Prophylactic treatment at childbirth.

It shall be the duty of any person who shall be in attendance on any childbirth to apply to the child such prophylactic treatment as may be prescribed by the department to prevent blindness from gonococcus infection and otherwise to comply with such rules, regulations, and reporting requirements as shall be prescribed by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1605, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Prophylactic treatment of the eyes of the newborn, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-3.

31-17-6.
Regulation of laboratories.

All laboratories conducting tests for sexually transmitted diseases shall comply with the rules, regulations, and reporting requirements prescribed therefor by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1603, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” near the middle of this Code section.

31-17-7.
Consent of minor to medical or surgical care or services; informing spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian.

The consent to the provision of medical or surgical care or services by a hospital or public clinic or to the performance of medical or surgical care or services by a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, when such consent is given by a minor who is or professes to be afflicted with a sexually transmitted disease or at risk for HIV, shall be as valid and binding as if the minor had achieved his or her majority, provided that any such treatment shall involve procedures and therapy related to conditions or illnesses arising out of the sexually transmitted disease or HIV diagnosis which gave rise to the consent authorized under this Code section. Any such consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmation by reason of minority. The consent of no other person or persons, including but not limited to a spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian, shall be necessary in order to authorize the provision to such minor of such medical or surgical care or services as are described in this subsection.

Upon the advice and direction of a treating physician or, if more than one, of any one of them, a member of the medical staff of a hospital or public clinic or a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery may, but shall not be obligated to, inform the spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian of any such minor as to the treatment given or needed. Such information may be given to or withheld from the spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian without the consent of the minor patient and even over the express refusal of the minor patient to the providing of such information.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 337, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2016, p. 752, § 2/HB 1058; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” twice in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Cross references.

Consent for surgical or medical treatment generally, T. 31, C. 9.

31-17-7.1.
Expedited partner therapy.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Expedited partner therapy” means the practice of prescribing, ordering, or dispensing antibiotic drugs to the sexual partner or partners of a patient clinically diagnosed with chlamydia or gonorrhea without physical examination of such partner or partners.

“Licensed practitioner” means a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state, an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant acting pursuant to delegated authority by a physician in accordance with Code Section 43-34-23 or 43-34-25 or subsection (e.1) of Code Section 43-34-103, or a registered professional nurse employed by the department or a county board of health.

A licensed practitioner who diagnoses a patient to be infected with chlamydia or gonorrhea may utilize expedited partner therapy in accordance with any rules and regulations established by the department for the management of the health of such patient’s sexual partner or partners.

Any licensed practitioner who, reasonably and in good faith, prescribes antibiotic drugs for expedited partner therapy in accordance with this Code section and any rules and regulations established by the department shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability and shall not be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct by such practitioner’s licensing board.

Any pharmacist licensed in this state who, reasonably and in good faith, dispenses antibiotic drugs pursuant to a prescription for expedited partner therapy in accordance with this Code section and any rules and regulations established by the department shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability and shall not be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct by the State Board of Pharmacy.

The department shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-17-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 3-2/SB 193.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 1-1/SB 193, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Untreated chlamydial infection has been linked to problems during pregnancy, including preterm labor, premature rupture of membranes, and low birth weight. The newborn may also become infected during delivery as the baby passes through the birth canal. Exposed newborns can develop eye and lung infections; and

“(2) Untreated gonococcal infection in pregnancy has been linked to miscarriages, premature birth and low birth weight, premature rupture of membranes, and chorioamnionitis. Gonorrhea can also infect an infant during delivery as the infant passes through the birth canal. If untreated, infants can develop eye infections.”

31-17-8.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1607, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.